Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.084

Department of agriculture—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the department of agriculture to the director, the director's confidential secretary, the deputy director, not more than eight assistant directors, the state veterinarian, and the milk pooling administrator employed under RCW 15.35.100.

[ 1992 c 58 s 3; 1990 c 37 s 2; 1983 c 248 s 11.]